California statutes. Water Code
If any duty relating to the assessment, levy, and collection of assessments is performed subsequent to the latest time it should have been performed, the time within which all duties consequent upon the performance of the preceding duty are to be performed shall be extended to allow the elapsing of the intervals required to elapse between the performance of the duties, and assessments shall not become delinquent for at least 30 days after the first publication of notice that the assessments are due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26080.

The assessment book, a copy of any portion of it certified by the collector, or the published list of delinquencies, showing unpaid assessments against any property is prima facie evidence of the assessment, the property assessed, the delinquency, the amount of assessments due and unpaid, and compliance with all forms of law relating to the assessment, equalization, and levy of the assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26081.

At any time after any assessment has become delinquent the board may direct the collector not to proceed with the sale of any delinquent property, but to bring suit against the delinquent in the proper court in the name of the district to enforce collection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26082.

The provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to pleadings, proofs, and trials are applicable to proceedings to enforce collection of assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26083.

In a suit for assessments the district may recover the amount of the delinquent assessments, penalties, and costs of suit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Publication of List of Delinquencies [26100. - 26108.]

26100.

When assessments are not payable in installments, the collector shall commence to publish the list of delinquencies on or before the first day of February.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26101.

When assessments are payable in installments, the first publication of the list of delinquencies shall not be made before the first day of July nor after the first day of September.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

26102.

The published list of delinquencies shall contain all of the following information relating to each parcel of land separately assessed on which the assessment is delinquent:

(a) The name of the assessee.

(b) The description of the land.

(c) The total amount due, which shall be the aggregate of the assessments, penalties, and costs due thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26103.

There need be no delinquent list other than the published list of delinquencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26104.

The collector shall publish with the list of delinquencies a notice, specifying:

(a) That each parcel separately assessed on which the amount due as shown on the list is not paid will be sold to the district.

(b) The time and place of the sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26105.

The list of delinquencies and notice shall be published once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper published in the county in which the delinquent property is situated but only information pertaining to and descriptions of land situated in the county need be set forth in the publication in that county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26106.

If any land assessed to the same person lies in more than one county, publication may be made in any county in which any portion of the land lies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26107.

Publication of the list of delinquencies and notice shall be made in the newspaper designated by the board. If assessments are not payable in installments, the designation of the newspaper shall be made by the board on or before the fifteenth day of December of the year in which the assessment was levied. If assessments are payable in two installments, the designation shall be made by the board on or before the fifteenth day of June following the year in which the assessment was levied. If the designation is not made by the board within the time provided in this section, the collector shall select the newspaper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26108.

If any error should occur in the publication of the notice of the sale of any delinquent property or the list of delinquencies which might invalidate a sale and the error is discovered prior to sale, the collector shall at once republish the notice of the sale and the items of the list of delinquency as to the property affected by the error, making the republication conform to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Assessment Sale [26125. - 26138.]

26125.

The place of the delinquent sale shall be at a point, designated by the collector, within the district or at the district office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26126.

The time of the delinquent sale shall be not less than 21 nor more than 28 days from the date of the first publication of the list of delinquencies or first republication as to property republished.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26127.

The collector may postpone the day of the delinquent sale from day to day, but the sale shall be made within three weeks from the day fixed in the notice of the sale. If any sale is stayed by legal proceedings, the time during which the sale is stayed shall not be a part of the time limited for making the sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26128.

On the day fixed for the sale in the published notice or on a subsequent day to which the collector may have postponed it the collector shall sell to the district the whole amount of each parcel of property separately assessed upon which the assessments remain unpaid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26129.

Thereupon the collector shall as to each parcel sold make an entry “sold to the district” in the assessment book.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26130.

After the delinquent sale the collector shall make out in duplicate and sign a certificate of sale for each parcel separately assessed and sold, setting forth all of the following:

(a) A description of the property sold.

(b) The amount for which it was sold.

(c) A statement that it was sold for a delinquent assessment.

(d) When the purchaser will be entitled to a deed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26131.

The certificate of sale may be in substantially the following form, the blanks being filled to show the facts in each case:Certificate of SaleNo. __________ Irrigation DistrictI, the collector
 of ______ Irrigation District, certify that on the ____ day of ____, 19__, after giving the required notice, I sold to ______ Irrigation District, the purchaser, for the sum of ______ dollars ($____) real property in the County of ______, State of California, described as follows:(Insert description.)This land was assessed to ________.This property was sold for a delinquent assessment levied on it in the year ____ by the district, and the sale price was the sum due and unpaid on the assessment and the penalties and costsThe purchaser will be entitled to a deed to the property at any time after five years from the date of the sale unless in the meantime the property is redeemed.
Witness
 my hand and the seal of the district this ______ dayof ________, 19__.(District Seal.)Collector of ______ Irrigation District

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1346.)
-------------------------------------------

26132.

Of each of the duplicate certificates of sale one shall be retained by the collector and the other shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the property is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

26133.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part to the contrary, in the case of a sale of property for taxes or assessments, except where the sale is conducted and the funds are accounted for as provided in Division 1 (commencing with Section 101) of the Revenue and Taxation Code, all proceeds shall be accounted for and distributed as provided in Article 12 (commencing with Section 53925) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 648.)
-------------------------------------------

26135.

The secretary shall notify the collector of assignments of certificates of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26136.

When property is sold for assessments imposed on it as the property of a particular person, no misnomer of the owner or supposed owner or any other mistake relating to the ownership of it affects the sale or renders it void or voidable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26137.

Ten years after it became delinquent or one year after the addition of this section, whichever is the later, any assessment levied by a district shall be conclusively presumed to have been paid, unless a sale for the nonpayment thereof was made prior to said time and the collector of the district on request shall mark such assessment conclusively presumed to have been paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1524.)
-------------------------------------------

26138.

Ten years after the issuance of a certificate of sale for the nonpayment of a district assessment or one year after the addition of this section, whichever is the later, it shall be conclusively presumed that redemption was made from the sale, unless prior to such time a deed was issued by the collector pursuant to the certificate of sale and such deed was recorded in the office of the recorder of the county in which the property described in the certificate of sale was located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1524.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Redemption and Its Termination [26225. - 26326.]



  ARTICLE 1. Redemption Generally [26225. - 26232.]

26225.

(a) Property sold for delinquent assessments may be redeemed within five years from the date of sale, or thereafter before a collector’s deed of the property has been delivered.

(b) If a collector’s deed has been delivered to the district, the period of redemption is extended until the first bid is received for the property or until the board determines the property is not to be sold as provided in Section 26290.

(c) Redemption before a collector’s deed of the property has been delivered may be made by payment in lawful money of the United States to the collector of the amount for which the property was sold plus a penalty equal to the adjusted annual rate established by the Franchise Tax Board, as provided in Section 19521 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, divided by 12 per month from the date of sale until redemption. Redemption after a collector’s deed has been delivered may only be made by payment of the total of the following amounts:

(1) The total of the amount of the sale shown on each certificate of sale outstanding.

(2) A penalty on each certificate of sale outstanding equal to the adjusted annual rate established by the Franchise Tax Board, as provided in Section 19521 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, divided by 12 per month from the date of sale until
 redemption.

(3) An amount for each year of escaped assessment determined as follows: the assessor shall establish the assessment value for the land for each year of escaped assessment and the collector shall apply the rate fixed in that year to determine the amount of the escaped assessment.

(4) The costs incurred in connection with recording the certificate of sale and the certificate of redemption.

(5) The costs of publication of notice incurred in connection with the delinquency.

(6) The costs incurred in connection with the preparation for a proposed sale of property, except that a district board may waive some or all of these costs if it determines that the circumstances support the waiver.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 144, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

26226.

On receipt of the redemption money plus the amount of the recorder’s fee fixed in this article the collector shall make out duplicate certificates of redemption reciting the payment and stating the date and number of the certificate of sale to which the redemption applies. If a collector’s deed is outstanding at the time of redemption the certificate of redemption shall also state the date of the deed and the place, book, and page at which it was recorded and shall constitute redemption from the deed, as well as all outstanding certificates of sale on the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 951.)
-------------------------------------------

26227.

One of the duplicate certificates of redemption shall be given to the redemptioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26228.

In case of a redemption of part of any property described in a certificate of sale, the part redeemed shall be described in the certificate of redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26229.

The collector shall record the other duplicate certificate of redemption with the county recorder in whose office the certificate of sale was recorded and shall pay the recording fee provided for in Section 27361 of the Government Code. Such recorded certificate of redemption is conclusive in favor of a purchaser or encumbrancer for value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 556.)
-------------------------------------------

26231.

When a certificate of sale has been assigned, the collector shall hold the redemption money for and on demand pay it to the holder of the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26232.

No incorrect statement or estimate of assessments due or amount required to redeem is binding upon a district or its officers unless the incorrect statement or estimate was in writing signed by the collector and relied upon in good faith by the party paying the amount designated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 648.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Partial Redemption [26250. - 26259.]

26250.

Redemption of a portion of any parcel of property separately from the whole parcel of which it is a part may be made as provided in this article at any time prior to the expiration of the period of redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26251.

If the portion to be separately redeemed has a separate valuation shown on the assessment book, the collector shall determine the amount due according to the valuation shown on the assessment book, and redemption of the portion may be made in the manner provided for in Article 1 of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26252.

If the portion to be separately redeemed does not have a separate valuation shown on the assessment book, the collector shall submit the description of the portion to the assessor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26253.

The assessor shall place a valuation on the described property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26254.

The collector shall determine the amount due according to the valuation so placed upon the portion upon which separate redemption is requested and shall then refer the proposed redemption to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26255.

The board may either:

(a) Confirm, modify, or set aside the valuation of the assessor.

(b) Refuse to authorize the separate redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26256.

The decision of the board shall be final, and the collector shall conform with it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26257.

Separate redemption, if authorized by the board, may be made in the manner provided for in Article 1 of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26258.

The redemptioner of a portion of a parcel of property may also pay that part of the current assessment levied against the parcel of land out of which the portion was separately redeemed, as may be determined by the board to be fair, based upon the valuation placed on the parcel as shown on the current assessment book.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26259.

Upon payment of the amount fixed as the sum to be paid as the current assessment on the portion of land separately redeemed, the collector shall enter on the current assessment book a reference to the order of the board authorizing payment of part of the assessment, the amount paid, and date of payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Deed on Termination of Redemption [26275. - 26280.]

26275.

If property sold for delinquent assessments has not been redeemed and five years have elapsed from the date of its sale, at least 30 days prior to the end of the redemption period the collector shall mail a notice specifying the date of sale and advising that, unless redeemed, a collector’s deed will be issued to the property at any time after five years from the date of sale has elapsed. The notice shall be sent by certified mail to the last assessee of the property addressed to his last address shown on the assessment roll. Five years after the date of sale, and 30 days after mailing of the notice, the collector, upon demand, shall deliver a collector’s deed to the
 property to the district or to the assignee holding the certificate of sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1346.)
-------------------------------------------

26276.

Collector’s deeds shall contain all of the following:

(a) Date of the sale.

(b) Statement that no person redeemed the property during the time allowed for its redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26277.

The deed made by the collector may be in substantially the following form, the blanks being filled to show the facts in each case:
Collector’s Deed 
____ Irrigation District 

On the ____ day of _____, 19__, the collector of _____ Irrigation District sold to _____ Irrigation District for a delinquent assessment real property situated within the district and in the County of _____, State of California, described as follows:
(Insert description.) 
No person has redeemed the property from the sale and the purchaser has demanded a deed to the property.

Wherefore, I, the collector of _____ Irrigation District, grant to _____ all of the real property aforesaid.
Witness my hand and the seal of the district this ____ day of _____, 19__. (District Seal.)
Collector of ______ Irrigation District

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 780.)
-------------------------------------------

26278.

If a collector’s deed is demanded by an assignee of a certificate of sale, the form of deed shall be amended by striking out the words “the purchaser” and inserting in lieu thereof substantially the following: “____ to whom the certificate of sale has been assigned.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26279.

In case partial redemption has been made, the form of the collector’s deed shall be modified to conform to the facts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26280.

The collector shall receive from the purchaser for the use of the district two dollars ($2.00) for making the deed except when the deed is to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Redemption After Collector’s Deed [26290. - 26290.]

26290.

(a) If a collector’s deed for property sold for delinquent assessments, or one installment of a delinquent assessment, has been delivered to the district, the district shall not sell or otherwise dispose of the property except as provided in this section.

(b) The district may sell the property, in which case it shall sell the property at a public auction upon having first given notice to the assessee by certified mail with return receipt requested and notice of the sale as
 prescribed by Sections 3701, 3702, and 3704 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(c) If the property is to be sold and is not redeemed before the first bid is received on the property, the district shall sell the property at public auction to the highest bidder at the time and place fixed.

(d) The board may establish a minimum sale price for the property which includes all of the following amounts:

(1) The amount of the sale described on each certificate of sale outstanding.

(2) The amount of a penalty on each certificate of sale outstanding that equals the adjusted annual rate established by the Franchise Tax Board, as provided in Section 19521 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, divided by 12 per month from the date of sale until sale at public
 auction.

(3) An amount that equals the amount for each year of escaped assessment. The assessor shall establish the assessment value for the land for each year of escaped assessment and the collector shall apply the rate fixed in that year to determine the amount of the escaped assessment.

(4) The costs incurred in connection with recording the certificate of sale .

(5) The costs of publication of notice incurred in connection with the delinquency.

(6) The costs incurred in connection with the preparation for a proposed sale of the property, except that a district board may waive some or all of these costs if it determines that the circumstances support the waiver.

(e) At any time after
 the delivery of the collector’s deed, and before the property is sold, the board may determine by resolution that the property is not to be sold, thereby terminating the right to redemption, but at least 30 days before the adoption of such a resolution the district shall give notice to the assessee, with return receipt requested, of the time, date, and place of the meeting at which the resolution will be considered and state that the property may be redeemed at any time before the adoption of the resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 144, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Effect of Deed [26300. - 26307.]

26300.

(a) Subject to the limitations of Section 3900.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and Sections 26225 and 26290 and subdivision (b) a collector’s deed conveys to the grantee free of all encumbrances the absolute title to the property described in it except when the land is owned by the United States or this state, in which case it is prima facie evidence of the right of possession.

(b) If the record title to minerals or to oil, gas or other hydrocarbon substances was held by one or more persons other than the owner of the land at the date of the assessment for which the property was
 sold, the collector’s deed to the land shall not convey title to such minerals, oil, gas or other hydrocarbon substances; provided that the minerals, oil, gas or other hydrocarbon substances so held under separate ownership shall be subject to sale for delinquent assessments assessed to the owner of such substances, in the same manner as with respect to land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 780.)
-------------------------------------------

26301.

Where property has been conveyed to a district by a collector’s deed, subject to the limitations of Section 26290, the district shall have the same rights in respect to the property and its rents, issues, and profits as a private purchaser.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 780.)
-------------------------------------------

26302.

A collector’s deed when acknowledged or proved is prima facie evidence that:

(a) The land was assessed as required by law.

(b) The land was equalized as required by law.

(c) The assessments were levied in accordance with law.

(d) The assessments were not paid.

(e) At a proper time and place the property was sold as prescribed by law.

(f) The property was not redeemed.

(g) The person who executed the deed was the proper officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26303.

Except as against actual fraud a collector’s deed acknowledged or proved is conclusive evidence of the regularity of all of the proceedings from the assessment by the assessor, inclusive, up to the execution of the deed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26304.

An action, proceeding, defense, answer, or cross-complaint based on the alleged invalidity or irregularity of any collector’s deed executed to the district or based on the alleged ineffectiveness of the deed to convey the absolute title to the property described in it may be commenced or interposed only within one year after the recordation of the deed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 244.)
-------------------------------------------

26305.

An action, proceeding, defense, answer, or cross-complaint based on the alleged invalidity or irregularity of any agreement of sale, deed, lease, or option executed by a district in connection with property deeded to it by its collector or based on the alleged ineffectiveness of the instrument to convey or affect the title to the property described in it may be commenced or interposed only within one year after the execution by the district of the instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 244.)
-------------------------------------------

26306.

The provisions of Sections 26304 and 26305 shall not apply in the following cases:

(a) Where the assessments for which the property was sold were paid before the sale.

(b) Where the property was redeemed after the sale.

(c) Where the land was not subject to assessment at the time it was assessed.

(d) Where no assessments were due on the land at the time of the sale.

(e) Where fraud is established.

(f) Where the deed is void on
 its face.

(g) Where the owner of the land was, at the time of the sale, a minor or a person who lacked mental capacity, in which case the earliest time that the statute of limitations begins to run is when the disability is removed.

(h) In an action described in Section 26304 or 26305 based on the alleged ineffectiveness of the collector’s deed to convey the title to minerals or to oil, gas or other hydrocarbon substances which was held by one or more persons other than the owner of the land on the date of the assessment for which the property was sold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 56.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

26307.

The burden of proof shall be upon the party urging the invalidity, irregularity, or ineffectiveness of an agreement, deed, lease, or option described in Sections 26304 and 26305 or of any assessments, sales, or assessment deeds of which he complains to show the invalidity, irregularity, or ineffectiveness, and he shall be required to plead specifically the grounds upon which he urges the invalidity, irregularity, or ineffectiveness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Recordation of Deed to District [26325. - 26326.]

26325.

A certificate of the secretary on a collector’s deed stating that it has been accepted by the board entitles the deed to be recorded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26326.

A collector’s deed to a district shall be recorded in the usual manner of recording conveyances of real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Assessment and Collection by County [26500. - 26553.]



  ARTICLE 1. Assessment and Levy by County [26500. - 26504.]

26500.

If a board neglects or refuses in any year to impose assessments pursuant to this part, the board of supervisors of the office county shall, as provided in this article, perform the duties of the board of the district in respect to imposing assessments in the same manner and with the same effect as if those duties were performed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 860, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

26501.

The applicable part of the equalized county assessment rolls of the affected counties shall be the basis of assessment for the district when its assessments are levied pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26502.

If any land subject to assessment for the purposes of the district does not appear upon a county assessment roll used as the basis of assessment for the district, the land omitted shall be forthwith assessed by the county assessor of the county in which it is situated upon an order of the board of supervisors making the assessment, and a description of the property omitted shall be written in the roll prepared for the district assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26503.

The board of supervisors shall meet and equalize each assessment made pursuant to this article with the assessment of other land in the district. The same notice shall be given by the board of supervisors of a meeting for the purpose of equalizing the assessment to be made as herein directed as is provided to be given by a district secretary when a board is to meet to equalize assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26504.

All expenses incurred in levying the assessment shall be borne by the district concerned. Unless the expenses are paid within 60 days from the time when a demand for them is made, they shall be collected by an action commenced by the district attorney of the county whose board of supervisors prepared the assessment roll.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Collection by County [26525. - 26529.]

26525.

In case of the neglect or refusal of the collector of any district to perform the duties imposed upon him, the tax collector of the office county shall perform his duties and be accountable therefor upon his official bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26526.

When any county tax collector collects any assessments for any district, he shall pay the proceeds to the county treasurer of the office county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26527.

As to money collected by the county tax collector and paid to the county treasurer, the county treasurer shall perform the duties ordinarily imposed on the treasurer of a district and be accountable therefor upon his official bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26528.

The county treasurer shall place the money of the district in a special fund to the credit of the district and shall disburse it to the proper persons for the purposes for which the assessments raising it were levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26529.

The county treasurer shall not pay any part of the money to the treasurer of the district until the county treasurer is satisfied that all of the valid obligations for which the assessments were levied and for which payment has been demanded have been paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Supervision by District Attorney and Attorney General [26550. - 26553.]

26550.

The district attorney of each office county shall ascertain each year whether the duties relating to the levying and collection of assessments in districts have been performed or not, and if he learns that the board or any official of any district has neglected or refused to perform any of these duties, he shall notify the board of supervisors or the county official required to perform the duty in the circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26551.

Unless the board of supervisors or county official proceeds to perform the duties he has been notified to perform within 30 days after the receipt of notice, the district attorney shall take action in court to compel performance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26552.

The district attorney shall give notice to other officials and take any action necessary to secure the performance in their proper sequence of subsequent duties relating to the levying and collection of assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26553.

For the enforcement of the levying and collection of any assessment required to be levied and collected for the payment of any debt incurred, when complaint is made to the Attorney General that the district attorney of any county has not performed any duty devolving upon him by the provisions of this article or is not proceeding with due diligence or in the proper manner in the performance of the duty, the Attorney General shall make an investigation. If he finds the charge to be true, the Attorney General shall take any action necessary to enforce the performance of the duties relating to the levying and collection of assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Alternative Procedure for Assessment and Collection by County [26600. - 26658.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [26600. - 26606.]

26600.

The procedure provided by this chapter shall be optional with any district electing as herein provided to proceed hereinunder and shall be an alternate procedure to that set forth in Chapters 1 to 7, inclusive, of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

26601.

At its option, the board of directors of a district may adopt a resolution declaring its intention to dispense with either the office of assessor or both the offices of assessor and collector of the district, and to transfer the duties of either the assessor or of both such officers to the assessor or to the assessor and tax collector of the county or counties in which the lands within such districts are located. Such resolution shall specify whether, under the proposed procedure, lands subject to sale for unpaid assessments shall be sold to the district or be declared tax-defaulted for nonpayment of the taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1420, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

26601.1.

(a) At its option, the board of directors of the Madera Irrigation District may adopt a resolution declaring its intention to dispense with either the office of the assessor or the office of the collector of the district. Such resolution shall specify either or both of the following:

(1) The county assessor is to assess all lands in the district in accordance with Section 401 of the Revenue and Taxation Code as of 12:01 a.m. on the first day of March of that year, and the assessor is to deliver a roll of all such assessments to the clerk of the district.

(2) The county collector is to collect the district’s annual assessment levy in the manner prescribed in Article 3 (commencing with Section 26650) of this chapter.

(b) Such resolution shall specify whether, under the proposed procedure, lands subject to sale for unpaid assessments shall be sold to the district or sold to the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 944.)
-------------------------------------------

26602.

Certified copies of such resolution shall be served on the clerk of the board of supervisors and on the auditor, assessor and collector of the county or counties in which the lands within the district are located and shall be filed with the State Board of Equalization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 63.)
-------------------------------------------

26603.

Within 30 days of the receipt of such resolution, the board of supervisors shall adopt a resolution advising the district of the charges to be made for the services to be performed by the county. If the board of directors elects to accept the terms offered by the county, it shall adopt a resolution reciting its acceptance, dispensing with the office of district assessor or with both the offices of district assessor and district collector, and transferring their duties to the assessor or to the assessor and tax collector of the county or counties in which the lands within the district are located. Such resolution shall specify whether, under the agreed
 upon procedure, lands subject to sale for unpaid assessments shall be sold to the district or be declared tax-defaulted for the nonpayment of those assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1420, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

26604.

The acceptance of the county’s terms by the district as evidenced by the board’s resolution shall constitute a contract between the county and the district which shall become effective on the last Friday of December next following its adoption and which shall continue for a term of four years from its effective date. The contract shall be automatically renewed for successive four-year terms unless terminated by either the district or the county by the adoption of a resolution and its service on either the clerk of the board of supervisors by the district, or on the secretary of the district by the county, at least 90 days prior to the expiration of the then current term
 of the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

26604.5.

The district shall comply with the provisions of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 54900) of Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code. The statement and map or plat shall also set forth the boundaries of any portion of the district in which a rate of taxation is to be levied which is different from the rate to be levied in any other portion of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 955.)